Utah statutes.
26-54-102.   Creation -- Traumatic Spinal Cord and Brain Injury Rehabilitation Fund.

(1)  Because the state finds that persons with traumatic spinal cord and brain injuries require intensive, focused, and specific rehabilitation there is created a restricted special revenue fund entitled the Traumatic Spinal Cord and Brain Injury Rehabilitation Fund.

(2)  The fund shall consist of:

(a)  gifts, grants, donations, or any other conveyance of money that may be made to the fund from private sources;

(b)  a portion of the impound fee as designated in Section 41-6a-1406; and

(c)  amounts as appropriated by the Legislature.

(3)  The fund shall be administered by the executive director of the Department of Health in consultation with the advisory committee created in Section 26-54-103.

(4)  A "qualified IRC 501(c)(3) charitable clinic" means a professional medical clinic that:

(a)  provides services for people in this state with traumatic spinal cord and brain injuries who require post-acute-care;

(b)  employs licensed therapy clinicians; and

(c)  has no less than five years experience operating a post-acute-care rehabilitation clinic in the state.

(5)  Fund money shall be used to assist qualified IRC 501(c)(3) charitable clinics to provide:

(a)  physical, occupational, and speech therapy; and

(b)  equipment necessary for daily living activities for people with spinal cord and brain injuries.

(6)  All actual and necessary operating expenses for the advisory committee and staff shall be paid by the fund.

